en: Plamil Foods Vegan, Plamil Foods Vegan Label
xx: Plamil Foods Vegan, Plamil Foods Vegan Label

en: Vegan Action
xx: Vegan Action

en: The Vegan Society, Vegan Society, Vegan Flower
xx: The Vegan Society, Vegan Society, Vegan Flower
ca: La Societat Vegana, Societat Vegana, Flor Vegana
de: The Vegan Society, Vegan Society, Veganblume
es: La Sociedad Vegana
fi: The Vegan Society, Vegan Society, Vegaanikukka
he: אגודת הטבעונים
hr: vegansko društvo
it: La società vegana
nl: The Vegan Society
pl: The Vegan Society, Vegan Society, Towarzystwo Wegańskie

en: Vegan Australia, Vegan Australia Certified
xx: Vegan Australia, Vegan Australia Certified

en: EVE Vegan, Expertise Vegan Europe
xx: EVE Vegan, Expertise Vegan Europe

en: Veganok, Vegan OK
xx: Veganok, Vegan OK

en: Vege Project, Vege Project Japan
xx: Vege Project, Vege Project Japan

en: Vege Project Vegetarian, Vege Project Japan Vegetarian
xx: Vege Project Vegetarian, Vege Project Japan Vegetarian

en: Vege Project Vegan, Vege Project Japan Vegan
xx: Vege Project Vegan, Vege Project Japan Vegan

en: plant-based, plant based, plantbased
fr: à base de plantes, à base de végétaux
sv: växtbaserad

en: Certified Plant Based, plant based certified
xx: Certified Plant Based, plant based certified

en: Vegetarian Society
xx: Vegetarian Society
es: La Sociedad Vegetariana
he: איגוד הצמחונות

en: Ovo-lacto-vegetarian
ca: Ovolactovegetarià
de: Ovo-lacto-vegetarisch
es: Ovo-lacto-vegetariano
fi: lakto-ovo-vegetaarinen
fr: Ovo-lacto-végétarien
hu: Ovo-lakto-vegetáriánus, Lakto-ovo-vegetáriánus
it: Ovo-latto-vegetariano
pt: Ovo-lacto-vegetariano
sv: Lakto-ovovegetarisk, lakto-ovovegetarianer

en: Ovo-vegetarian
ca: Ovovegetarià
de: Ovo-vegetarisch
es: Ovo-vegetariano
fi: ovo-vegetaarinen
fr: Ovo-végétarien
hu: Ovo-vegetáriánus
it: Ovo-vegetariano
pt: Ovo-vegetariano
sv: Ovo-vegetarisk, ovovegetarisk, ovovegetarianer

en: Lacto-vegetarian
ca: Lactovegetarià
de: Lacto-vegetarisch
es: Lacto-vegetariano
fi: lakto-vegetaarinen
fr: Lacto-végétarien
hu: Lakto-vegetáriánus
it: Latto-vegetariano
pt: Latto-vegetariano
sv: Lakto-vegetarisk

en: European Vegetarian Union, EU Vegetarian Union, V-LABEL.EU, European V-LABEL, EU V-LABEL
ca: Unió Vegetariana Europea
cs: V-Label Evropské Vegetariánské Unie
da: Europæiske Vegetarunion, European Vegetarian Union
de: Europäische Vegetarier-Union, V-Label
eo: Eŭropa vegetarana unuiĝo
es: Unión Vegetariana Europea
fi: Euroopan vegetaariliitto
fr: Union Végétarienne Européenne, European Vegetarian Union, EU Vegetarian Union, V-LABEL.EU, European V-Label, EU V-Label
he: איחוד הצמחונות האירופי
hr: Europska vegetarijanska unija, European Vegetarian Union, EU Vegetarian Union, V-LABEL.EU, European V-Label, EU V-Label, EVU
hu: Európai Vegetáriánus Szövetség, European Vegetarian Union, EU Vegetarian Union, V-LABEL.EU, European V-LABEL, EU V-LABEL
it: Unione Europea Vegetariani
nl: Europese vegetarische unie
pl: V-Label
pt: União Vegetariana Europeia, European Vegetarian Union
sv: Europeiska Vegetariska Unionen

en: European Vegetarian Union Vegetarian, European Vegetarian Union - Vegetarian, EVU Vegetarian
da: Europæiske Vegetarunion Vegetarisk, European Vegetarian Union Vegetarisk, Europæiske Vegetarunion - Vegetarisk, European Vegetarian Union - Vegetarisk, EVU Vegetarian
de: Europäische Vegetarier-Union Vegetarisch, Europäische Vegetarier-Union - Vegetarisch, EVU Vegetarian
es: Unión Vegetariana Europea Vegetariano, Unión Vegetariana Europea Vegetariana, Unión Vegetariana Europea - Vegetariano, Unión Vegetariana Europea - Vegetariana, EVU Vegetarian
fr: Union Végétarienne Européenne Végétarien, Union Végétarienne Européenne - Végétarien, EVU Vegetarian
pl: V-Label Vegetarian, V-Label wegetariańskie
pt: União Vegetariana Europeia - Vegetariano, European Vegetarian Union - Vegetarian
sv: Europeiska Vegetariska Unionen Vegetarisk, Europeiska Vegetariska Unionen - Vegetarisk, EVU Vegetarian

en: European Vegetarian Union Vegan, European Vegetarian Union - Vegan, EVU Vegan
ca: Unió Vegana Vegetariana Europea, EVU Vegan
cs: Veganské označení Evropské Vegetariánské Unie, EVU Vegan
da: Europæiske Vegetarunion Vegansk, European Vegetarian Union Vegansk, Europæiske Vegetarunion - Vegansk, European Vegetarian Union - Vegansk, EVU Vegan
de: Europäische Vegetarier-Union Vegan, Europäische Vegetarier-Union - Vegan, EVU Vegan
es: Unión Vegetariana y vegana Europea, Unión Vegetariana Europea Vegano, Unión Vegetariana Europea Vegana, Unión Vegetariana Europea - Vegano, Unión Vegetariana Europea - Vegana, EVU Vegan
fi: Euroopan vegetaariliitto vegaaninen, EVU vegaaninen, EVU Vegan
fr: Union Végétarienne Européenne Végétalien, Union Végétarienne Européenne Vegan, Union Végétarienne Européenne - Végétalien, Union Végétarienne Européenne - Vegan, EVU Vegan
it: Unione Vegetariana Europea Vegano, Unione Vegetariana Europea - Vegano, EVU Vegan
nl: Europese Vegetarische Unie Vegan, Europese Vegetarische Unie - Vegan, EVU Vegan
pl: V-Label Vegan, V-Label wegańskie
pt: União Vegetariana Europeia Vegano, European Vegetarian Union Vegan, União Vegetariana Europeia - Vegano, European Vegetarian Union - Vegan
sv: Europeiska Vegetariska Unionen Vegan, Europeiska Vegetariska Unionen - Vegan, EVU Vegan

en: V-Label International, V-LABEL.COM
xx: V-Label International, V-LABEL.COM

en: V-Label International Vegetarian
xx: V-Label International Vegetarian